Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB641.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9714(g) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 9714. Sentences for second and subsequent offenses.* * *(a.2) Parole.--Any person sentenced under subsection (a) shall not be eligible for parole until the person has served 70% of the maximum sentence as provided under subsection (a.1).* * *(g) [Definition.--As used in this section, the term "crime of violence" means murder of the third degree, voluntary manslaughter, manslaughter of a law enforcement officer as 12345678910111213141516171819 defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507(c) or (d) (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer), murder of the third degree involving an unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2604(c) (relating to murder of unborn child), aggravated assault of an unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2606 (relating to aggravated assault of unborn child), aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault), assault of law enforcement officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1(a)(1) (relating to assault of law enforcement officer), use of weapons of mass destruction as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2716(b) (relating to weapons of mass destruction), terrorism as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2717(b)(2) (relating to terrorism), strangulation when the offense is graded as a felony as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation), trafficking of persons when the offense is graded as a felony of the first degree as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals), rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, aggravated indecent assault, incest, sexual assault, arson endangering persons or aggravated arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a) or (a.1) (relating to arson and related offenses), ecoterrorism as classified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3311(b)(3) (relating to ecoterrorism), kidnapping, burglary as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(a)(1) (relating to burglary), robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery), or robbery of a motor vehicle, drug delivery resulting in death as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2506(a) (relating to drug delivery resulting in death), or criminal attempt, criminal conspiracy or criminal solicitation to commit murder or any of the offenses listed above, or an equivalent crime under the laws of this 20250HB0641PN0651 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth in effect at the time of the commission of that offense or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction.] Definitions.-- As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Crime of violence." An offense under any of the following:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 901 (relating to criminal attempt), involving an attempt to commit an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(a) or (b) (relating to murder) or 2507(a) or (b) (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer) or any of the offenses under paragraph (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21) or (22).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 902 (relating to criminal solicitation), involving solicitation to commit an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(a) or (b) or 2507(a) or (b) or any of the offenses under paragraph (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21) or (22).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. § 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy), involving conspiracy to commit an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(a) or (b) or 2507(a) or (b) or any of the offenses under paragraph (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21) or (22).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502(c).(5) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter).(6) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2506 (relating to drug delivery resulting in death).(7) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507(c) or (d).20250HB0641PN0651 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2701(a)(3) or (4) (relating to simple assault).(9) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).(10) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1 (relating to assault of law enforcement officer).(11) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 (relating to kidnapping).(12) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(13) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(14) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).(15) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(16) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a) (relating to arson and related offenses).(17) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502 (relating to burglary), if at the time of the offense the structure entered was adapted for overnight accommodation.(18) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery).(19) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).(20) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4302 (relating to incest).(21) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims), involving a witness to or a victim of a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 or 2507 or any of the offenses under paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (22), (23) or (24) or a violation of section 13(a)(30) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, 20250HB0641PN0651 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(22) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party), involving a witness to, victim of or party to a proceeding alleging a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 or 2507 or any of the offenses under paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21), (23) or (24) or a violation of section 13(a)(30) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(23) A crime equivalent to one listed under paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21) or (22) under the laws of this Commonwealth in effect at the time of the commission of the offense.(24) A crime equivalent to one listed under paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21) or (22) under Federal law or in a jurisdiction outside this Commonwealth.Section 2. Section 6137(a)(3.1)(ii) of Title 61 is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6137. Parole power.(a) General criteria for parole.--* * *(1.1) The board may not release on parole any inmate serving a sentence imposed under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(a)(relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses) until the inmate has served at least 70% of the maximum sentence as provided under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(a.1).20250HB0641PN0651 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3.1) * * *(ii) This paragraph shall not apply to offenders who are currently serving a term of imprisonment for a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714 [(relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses)] or for a crime requiring registration under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0641PN0651 - 6 - 12345678910